test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-geermanj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - gērmaņ: # Noun 133 'eng /est parkal/fin' - full paradigm
     gērmaņ+N+Sg+Nom: gērmaņ
     gērmaņ+N+Sg+Gen: gērmaņ
     gērmaņ+N+Sg+Par: gērmaņņõ
     gērmaņ+N+Sg+Dat: gērmaņņõn
     gērmaņ+N+Sg+Ins: gērmaņņõks
     gērmaņ+N+Sg+Ill: gērmaņņõ
     gērmaņ+N+Sg+Ela: gērmaņšt
     gērmaņ+N+Pl+Nom: gērmaņņõd
     gērmaņ+N+Pl+Gen: gērmaņņõd
     gērmaņ+N+Pl+Par: gērmaņņidi
     gērmaņ+N+Pl+Dat: gērmaņņõdõn
     gērmaņ+N+Pl+Ins: gērmaņņõdõks
     gērmaņ+N+Pl+Ill: gērmaņņiž
     gērmaņ+N+Pl+Ela: gērmaņņist
